Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 2

Tennessee Missing Children Recovery Act

37-10-201. Short title — Part definitions.

This part shall be referred to as the “Tennessee Missing Children Recovery Act.”

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child” means any person under twenty-one (21) years of age;

“Missing child” means a child who is believed to have been removed by force, persuasion, trick, enticement, false pretense, has voluntarily left the custody of such child's parent without permission or is absent for unexplained or unknown reasons; and

“Parent” means a natural or adoptive parent, guardian, or person or organization standing in a loco parentis position by virtue of an order of a court.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 1.

Cross-References. Interstate communication of criminal statistics, title 38, ch. 10.

Law Reviews.

1985 Tennessee Survey: Selected Developments in Tennessee Law, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 373 (1986).

37-10-202. Initial missing child report — Statement of identification information.

Whenever the parent knows, learns or believes that a child under the parent's charge and care is missing, such parent shall report the child to a police or sheriff's office, Tennessee bureau of investigation or any law enforcement officer and make a statement to the agency of all available facts that will aid in the recognition, identification or location and recovery of the child.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 2.

37-10-203. Formal missing child report — Entry of report into NCIC.

Every law enforcement officer receiving information from a parent or any source that it deems creditable shall prepare a formal missing child report. A law enforcement agency reporting a missing child is further required to enter or cause to be entered the report of the missing child into the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) within two (2) hours of the receipt of the initial missing child report.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 3; 2009, ch. 76, § 1; 2012, ch. 856, § 1.

37-10-204. Reports to juvenile court judge — Missing child order.

The law enforcement agency taking or making a report of a missing child shall submit its report, together with any additional data reduced to writing in the form of statements or notes, to a judge of the juvenile court within a reasonable time.

The judge shall review the report and information and determine whether or not there is probable cause to believe the child is a missing child.

If a decision of “missing child” is made, a “missing child” order shall be issued and delivered to any lawful officer or the Tennessee bureau of investigation authorizing the bureau or any officer holding the order, a true copy thereof or possessing knowledge of the existence thereof, to investigate the circumstances relating to the missing child in compliance with existing constitutional, statutory and case law and upon identification or location of the missing child to take custody of the child, using legal process when necessary, for immediate delivery to a judge of any juvenile or other court of record for appropriate orders and disposition pursuant to law.

If probable cause for issuance of a “missing child” order is not found, the judge shall so order and the missing child report should be cancelled by the bureau, which shall give notice of the cancellation to all appropriate law enforcement agencies.

If the court issues a “missing child” order pursuant to this section and believes that certain telephone records are necessary to or would be of assistance in locating such child, the court may send a copy of the “missing child” order and a written request for any telephone records the court believes to be pertinent to the missing child who is the subject of the order to any telecommunications service provider as defined in § 65-4-101. The request shall state with all reasonable specificity the precise telephone records requested and the reason such records are pertinent to locating the missing child.

Upon receiving such a request, the telecommunications service provider shall, without delay and at no charge, supply the requested telephone records to the juvenile court judge issuing the request.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 4; 2004, ch. 627, § 1.

Cross-References. Interstate communication of criminal statistics, title 38, ch. 10.

37-10-205. Forms — File of missing children — Monthly reports of missing children — Dissemination of information.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall specify a uniform form for the missing child report and data, so that the same may be transmitted by computer or mail. The bureau shall also establish, maintain and manage a file of “missing children” and collect any available relevant data concerning the missing child and disseminate the same by computer, mail or any other reliable communication device to any law enforcement agency. The bureau shall publish a monthly report of all missing children and recovery of children and distribute the same to all full-time law enforcement agencies in the state, the general assembly and executive branches of government, to the news media, and to every director of schools in the state, who shall then distribute the report to the principal of every school within such director's school system. Whenever possible, this report shall contain the photographs of the missing children. The bureau is authorized to transmit information on missing children to the federal bureau of investigation or any other state maintaining missing children files and may conform its reports to any federal agency reports so as to facilitate the automated exchange of information.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 5; 1987, ch. 136, § 1.

Cross-References. Interstate communication of criminal statistics, title 38, ch. 10.

37-10-206. Child fingerprint cards.

Parents are authorized to have official fingerprint cards made for their children by taking their children to any law enforcement office or by having the same made by any private or public agency upon signing an authorization therefor. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall deliver appropriate blank child fingerprint cards to law enforcement offices or private agencies upon request without cost. Whenever any child is fingerprinted as authorized in this section, the card shall be delivered to the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the parent as specified by the parent in the authorization form. The bureau shall not be required to accept any nonstandard child fingerprint card.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 6.

37-10-207. Children's fingerprint card file.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall maintain a separate fingerprint card file for “Children”, which shall consist of the “children” fingerprint cards submitted to it pursuant to §37-10-206, together with any latent prints believed to be children's prints that have been submitted to it for purposes of identifying missing children. Once each year the bureau shall remove and return to the parent or destroy all fingerprint cards from the children's fingerprint file for children who have become eighteen (18) years of age, unless the child has been reported missing or the child requests in writing that such child's fingerprint remain in the file. Also, the bureau shall destroy any child's fingerprint card upon written request of the parent. The bureau is also authorized to receive “children” fingerprint cards or copies thereof from the federal bureau of investigation when the prints may have been sent directly to the bureau without having also been sent to the Tennessee bureau of investigation as herein provided. The bureau shall not file any of the children's fingerprints authorized herein in any other fingerprint card file. The bureau shall only search the children's fingerprint card file for the purpose of trying to locate or identify children who have been reported as missing children, and the file shall never be searched for the purpose of identifying a child as having committed a crime unless the parent so requests in writing.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 7.

37-10-208. Impact upon interstate compact on juveniles.

The provisions of §§37-10-201 —37-10-207 are not intended to modify any of the provisions of chapter 4 of this title relating to the Interstate Compact on Juveniles, but the documents herein authorized may be used in aid of proceedings under that chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 158, § 7.

37-10-209. Distribution of materials concerning missing children — Solicitation of contributions.

No organization shall solicit contributions for the purpose of distributing materials containing information relating to missing children unless it complies with all of the following requirements:

Such organization has been incorporated under title 48, chapters 51-68, or the nonprofit corporation law of another state prior to the time of the solicitation of contributions, or such organization is an unincorporated charitable association, trust, society, or other group; and

It has been exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(a) and described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10) or 501(c)(19) as now or hereafter amended, prior to the time of the solicitation of contributions.

No organization that solicits contributions for the purpose of distributing materials containing information relating to missing children shall expressly state or imply in any way that it is affiliated with, or is soliciting contributions on behalf of, an organization established to assist in the location of missing children without the express written consent of that organization.

Whoever violates subsection (a) or (b) is guilty of improper solicitation of contributions for missing children, which shall be punishable as a Class A misdemeanor.

“Missing children” or “missing child” means a minor child who has run away from or who is otherwise missing from the home of, or the care, custody and control of, such child's parents, custodial parent, guardian, legal guardian, or other person having responsibility for the minor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting any person or organization from the requirements of the Solicitation of Charitable Funds Act, compiled in title 48, chapter 101, part 5.

Acts 1986, ch. 759, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.